Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-173
National Guard; Nebraska State Guard; labor service; jury service; exemptions.

The officers and enlisted men of the Nebraska National Guard and Nebraska State Guard shall be exempt from (1) working on roads and highways, and (2) sitting on any grand or petit jury within this state while they are active members thereof.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 64, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 3963;

C.S.1922, § 3361;

C.S.1929, § 55-180;

R.S.1943, § 55-187;

Laws 1945, c. 134, § 1, p. 424;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-187;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 71, p. 1604.

For other provisions for exemption from jury service, see section 25-1650.